apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="st/ôl__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ôl</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ôla</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olu</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ôl</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ole</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olom</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oly</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olov</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olom</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oly</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oloch</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olami</l>
          <r>ôl<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="organizm/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>och</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ochotsk/é more__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é<b/>more</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ého<b/>mora</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ému<b/>moru</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é<b/>more</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é<b/>more</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om<b/>mori</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ým<b/>morom</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Chorvátsk/o__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sa__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>seba</l>
          <r>sa<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>sa<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sebe</l>
          <r>sa<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="emph"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r>sa<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>seba</l>
          <r>sa<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="emph"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sebe</l>
          <r>sa<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sebou</l>
          <r>sa<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="I__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="rom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="možno__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e><par n="sa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="možno"><i>možno</i><par n="možno__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="treba"><i>treba</i><par n="možno__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="stôl"><i>st</i><par n="st/ôl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ochotské more"><i>Ochotsk</i><par n="Ochotsk/é more__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Chorvátsko"><i>Chorvátsk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Francúzsko"><i>Francúzsk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Maďarsko"><i>Maďarsk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Taliansko"><i>Taliansk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rakúsko"><i>Rakúsk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Česko"><i>Česk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Španielsko"><i>Španielsk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Poľsko"><i>Poľsk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Portugalsko"><i>Portugalsk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rusko"><i>Rusk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rumunsko"><i>Rumunsk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Anglicko"><i>Anglick</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Holandsko"><i>Holandsk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nemecko"><i>Nemeck</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Slovensko"><i>Slovensk</i><par n="Chorvátsk/o__np"/></e>
    <e lm="abstrakcionizmus"><i>abstrakcionizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anachronizmus"><i>anachronizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antisemitizmus"><i>antisemitizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="austroslavizmus"><i>austroslavizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boľševizmus"><i>boľševizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dadaizmus"><i>dadaizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dialektizmus"><i>dialektizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eklektizmus"><i>eklektizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="euroskepticizmus"><i>euroskepticizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fatalizmus"><i>fatalizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="freudizmus"><i>freudizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heroizmus"><i>heroizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="idiomatizmus"><i>idiomatizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iredentizmus"><i>iredentizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="katechizmus"><i>katechizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konjunkturalizmus"><i>konjunkturalizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="liberalizmus"><i>liberalizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="masochizmus"><i>masochizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monizmus"><i>monizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neokolonializmus"><i>neokolonializm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="panteizmus"><i>panteizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protekcionizmus"><i>protekcionizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="schematizmus"><i>schematizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terorizmus"><i>terorizm</i><par n="organizm/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="b"><i>b</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="c"><i>c</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="d"><i>d</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="f"><i>f</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="g"><i>g</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="h"><i>h</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="j"><i>j</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="k"><i>k</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="l"><i>l</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="m"><i>m</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="n"><i>n</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="p"><i>p</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="q"><i>q</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="r"><i>r</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="s"><i>s</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="t"><i>t</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="u"><i>u</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="v"><i>v</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="W"><i>w</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="x"><i>x</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="y"><i>y</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="z"><i>z</i><par n="a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="I"><i>I</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="II"><i>II</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="III"><i>III</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="IV"><i>IV</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="V"><i>V</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VI"><i>VI</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VII"><i>VII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VIII"><i>VIII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="IX"><i>IX</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="X"><i>X</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XI"><i>XI</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XII"><i>XII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIII"><i>XIII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIV"><i>XIV</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XV"><i>XV</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVI"><i>XVI</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVII"><i>XVII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVIII"><i>XVIII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIX"><i>XIX</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XX"><i>XX</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="C"><i>C</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="D"><i>D</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="L"><i>L</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="M"><i>M</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
